Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1229.01
Personal property; return; filing improperly signed; procedure.

If any listing of personal property required to be filed under section 77-1229 is filed by or on behalf of any person and is not signed as required by law, the county assessor shall notify the person in writing of the fact of such filing and that he or she is required, on or before the last date for filing the statement or within ten days from the date of such notice, whichever is later, to appear and sign such statement or to file a properly signed corrected statement and that, upon failure to do so, the unsigned statement shall be presumed to be correct.

Laws 1963, c. 437, § 1, p. 1454;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 99;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 72.